Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.080

Business district.

"Business district" means the territory contiguous to and including a highway when within any six hundred feet along such highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including but not limited to hotels, banks, or office buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet collectively on both sides of the highway.

[ 1975 c 62 s 2; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.080. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 9; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 c 62: See note following RCW 36.75.010.